Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-406
Assisted-living facility, defined.

Assisted-living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-5903.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB439, § 1.
July 19, 2018